Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
CHAPTER 396 Claims Against Decedents’ Estates

396.005.
Publication of notice to creditors — Posting of notice in case of small estates. [Repealed.]

396.010.
Verification of claims required — Exception. [Repealed.]

396.011.
Presentation of claims against estate — Time limitations — Exceptions.

All claims against a decedent’s estate which arose before the death of the decedent, excluding claims of the United States, the State of Kentucky and any subdivision thereof, whether due or to become due, absolute or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated, founded on contract, tort, or other legal basis, if not barred earlier by other statute of limitations, are barred against the estate, the personal representative, and the heirs and devisees, unless presented within six (6) months after the appointment of the personal representative, or where no personal representative has been appointed, within two (2) years after the decedent’s death.

Nothing in this section shall affect or prevent:

To the extent of the security only, any proceeding to enforce any mortgage, pledge, lien or other security interest securing an obligation of the decedent or upon property of the estate; or

To the limits of the insurance protection only, any proceeding to establish liability of the decedent or the personal representative for which he is protected by liability insurance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 6, effective July 15, 1988; 2020 ch. 25, § 8, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 71, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

396.012.
Publication of notice by clerk of probate court and actual notice by personal representative regarding time limitations for filing claims. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 25, § 7, effective July 15, 2020; repealed by 2021 ch. 71, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

396.015.
Method of presentation of claims.

Claims against a decedent’s estate shall be presented as follows:

The claimant may deliver or mail to the personal representative a written statement of the claim indicating its basis, the name and address of the claimant, and the amount claimed, or may file a written statement of the claim, in the form prescribed by rule, with the clerk of the court. If presentment shall be made by filing a written statement of the claim with the clerk of the court, the claimant shall certify as provided in the rules of civil procedure that a copy of the written statement has been given or mailed to the personal representative and his attorney. The claim shall be deemed presented on the first to occur of receipt of the written statement of claim by the personal representative, or the filing of the claim with the court. If a claim is not yet due, the date when it will become due shall be stated. If the claim is contingent or unliquidated, the nature of the uncertainty shall be stated. If the claim is secured, the security shall be described. Failure to describe correctly the security, the nature of any uncertainty, and the due date of a claim not yet due does not invalidate the presentation made.

In an action pending against the decedent at the time of his death, which action survives at law, the substitution of the personal representative for the decedent, or motion therefor, shall constitute the presentation of a claim. Such claim shall be deemed to have been presented from the time of substitution, or motion therefor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 7, effective July 15, 1988.

396.020.
Action not to be brought before demand — Exception — When additional affidavit unnecessary. [Repealed.]

396.025.
Limitations on filing claims. [Repealed.]

396.026.
Affidavit of claimant.

Upon any claim being presented in the manner described in subsection (1) of KRS

396.015

, the personal representative may require by written request mailed to the claimant, the affidavit of the claimant or other satisfactory evidence that such claim is justly due, that no payments have been made thereon, and that there are no offsets against same to the knowledge of the claimant; or if any payments have been made, or any offsets exist, that their nature and amount be shown by the evidence or stated in the affidavit.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 8, effective July 15, 1988.

396.027.
Limitation on time to commence action on rejected claim. [Repealed.]

396.030.
Interest accruing after death — When allowed. [Repealed.]

396.035.
Limitation on commencement of action on claim.

No action shall be brought against a personal representative on a claim against decedent’s estate unless the claimant shall have first presented his claim in the manner described in KRS

396.015

. The foregoing limitation shall be in addition to that limitation on the commencement of an action against a personal representative set forth in KRS

395.270

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 9, effective July 15, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Written Statement of Claim Against Estate, Form 234.09.

396.040.
Usury and credits to be deducted before claim paid. [Repealed.]

396.045.
Claims not barred by statutes of limitations.

No claim shall be barred by a statute of limitations which would expire during the period commencing with the decedent’s death and ending six (6) months thereafter if such claim is presented within six (6) months after the decedent’s death. This subsection shall not apply with respect to any statute of limitations imposed by KRS Chapter 396.

For purposes of any statute of limitations, the proper presentment of a claim under KRS

396.015

is equivalent to commencement of an action on the claim.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 10, effective July 15, 1988.

396.050.
Reference to commissioner — Advertisement of. [Repealed.]

396.055.
Allowance or disallowance of claims — Notice — Effect.

As to claims presented in the manner described in KRS

396.015

within the time limit prescribed in KRS

396.011

, the personal representative may mail a notice to any claimant stating that the claim has been allowed or disallowed. If, after allowing or disallowing a claim, the personal representative changes his decision concerning the claim, he shall notify the claimant. The personal representative may not change a disallowance of a claim after the time for the claimant to commence an action on the claim has run and the claim has been barred. Every claim which is disallowed in whole or in part by the personal representative is barred so far as not allowed unless the claimant commences an action against the personal representative not later than sixty (60) days after the mailing of the notice of disallowance or partial allowance if the notice warns the claimant of the impending bar. Failure of the personal representative to mail notice to a claimant of action on his claim for sixty (60) days after the time for original presentation of the claim has expired has the effect of a notice of allowance, except that upon petition of the personal representative and upon notice to the claimant, the court at any time before payment of such claim may for cause shown permit the personal representative to disallow such claim.

A judgment against a personal representative to enforce a claim against a decedent’s estate is an allowance of the claim.

In the case of a disallowance of a claim which has not matured or which is contingent or unliquidated, the personal representative may consent to an extension of the sixty (60) day period imposed by subsection (1) of this section for the commencement of an action on a disallowed claim, or to avoid injustice, the court, on petition, may order an extension of the sixty (60) day period, but in no event shall the extension run beyond the applicable statute of limitations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 11, effective July 15, 1988.

396.060.
Liability of heirs and devisees — Joint action against them and representative. [Repealed.]

396.065.
Waiver of defense of limitations.

If an estate is solvent the personal representative, with the consent of all successors of the decedent whose interests would be affected, may waive any defense of limitations available to the estate. If the defense is not waived, no claim which was barred by any statute of limitations at the time of the decedent’s death shall be allowed or paid.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 12, effective July 15, 1988.

396.070.
Liability of representative, heir and devisee of heir or devisee. [Repealed.]

396.075.
Payment of claims.

Upon the expiration of six (6) months from the date of his appointment, the personal representative may proceed to pay the claims allowed against the estate in the order of priority prescribed, after making appropriate provision for exemptions and allowances provided by law, for claims already presented which have not yet been allowed and for unbarred claims which may yet be presented, including costs and expenses of administration. By petition to the court in a proceeding for the purpose, a claimant whose claim has been allowed but not paid as provided herein may secure an order directing the personal representative to pay the claim to the extent that funds of the estate are available for the payment.

The personal representative at any time may pay any just claim which has not been barred, with or without formal presentation, but he is personally liable to any other claimant whose claim is allowed and who is injured by such payment if:

The payment was made before the expiration of the time limit stated in subsection (1) of this section and the personal representative failed to require the payee to give adequate security for the refund of any of the payment necessary to pay other claimants; or

The payment was made, due to the negligence or willful fault of the personal representative, in such manner as to deprive the injured claimant of his priority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 13, effective July 15, 1988.

396.080.
Equitable action by creditor — Lien may be obtained. [Repealed.]

396.085.
Interest on allowed claims.

Unless otherwise provided in any judgment against the personal representative:

An allowed claim not based on a contract making a provision for interest:

Shall not bear interest for the period commencing with the date of the decedent’s death and ending sixty (60) days after the time for original presentation of the claim has expired; and

Shall bear interest at the legal rate after the period specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section provided the claimant has demanded the payment of interest in the written statement of the claim delivered or mailed to the personal representative or filed with the clerk of the court as provided in KRS

396.015

.

An allowed claim based on a contract making a provision for interest shall bear interest from the date of the decedent’s death in accordance with the contract provision.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 14, effective July 15, 1988.

396.090.
Preferred claims. [Repealed.]

396.095.
Order of payment of claims.

If the applicable assets of the estate are insufficient to pay all claims in full, the personal representative shall make payment of claims in the following order:

Costs and expenses of administration; then

Funeral expenses; then

Debts and taxes with preference under federal law and other laws of this state; then

All other claims.

No preference shall be given in the payment of any claim over any other claim of the same class, and a matured claim shall not be entitled to a preference over unmatured claims.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 15, effective July 15, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Ratliff, Kentucky Probate — A Simple Overview, Volume 54, No. 1, Winter 1990 Ky. Bench & B. 16.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Probate Procedures Dispensing with Administration, § 232.00.

396.100.
Liens. [Repealed.]

396.105.
Payment of secured claim.

Payment of a secured claim shall be upon the basis of the amount allowed if the creditor surrenders his security; otherwise payment shall be upon the basis of one (1) of the following:

If the creditor exhausts his security before receiving payment, unless precluded by other law, upon the amount of the claim allowed less than the fair value of the security; or

If the creditor does not have the right to exhaust his security or has not done so, upon the amount of the claim allowed less the value of the security determined by converting it into money according to the terms of the agreement pursuant to which the security was delivered to the creditor, or by the creditor and personal representative by agreement, arbitration, compromise or litigation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 16, effective July 15, 1988.

396.110.
Alienation of estate — Effect of. [Repealed.]

396.115.
Payment of contingent, unliquidated or future claims.

If a claim which will mature at a future time, or a contingent or unliquidated claim, matures or becomes certain before the distribution of the estate, and if the claim has been allowed, it shall be paid in the same manner as matured and absolute claims of the same class.

In other cases the personal representative or, on petition of the personal representative or the claimant in a special proceeding for the purpose, the court may provide for payment as follows:

If the claimant consents, he may be paid the present or agreed value of the claim, taking any uncertainty into account;

Arrangement for future payment, or possible payment, on the happening of the contingency or on liquidation may be made by creating a trust, giving a mortgage, obtaining a bond or security from a distributee, or otherwise.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 17, effective July 15, 1988.

396.120.
Perishable goods sold first. [Repealed.]

396.125.
Deduction of counterclaim.

In allowing a claim the personal representative may deduct any counterclaim which the estate has against the claimant. In determining a claim against an estate a court shall reduce the amount allowed by the amount of any counterclaims and, if the counterclaims exceed the claim, render a judgment against the claimant in the amount of the excess. A counterclaim, liquidated or unliquidated, may arise from a transaction other than that upon which the claim is based. A counterclaim may give rise to relief exceeding in amount or different in kind from that sought in the claim.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 18, effective July 15, 1988.

396.130.
Refunding bond — Representative may require. [Repealed.]

396.135.
Execution against estate property prohibited.

No execution may issue upon nor may any levy be made against any property of the estate under any judgment against a decedent or a personal representative, but this section shall not be construed to prevent the enforcement of mortgages, pledges or liens upon real or personal property in an appropriate proceeding.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 19, effective July 15, 1988.

396.140.
Overpayment — Recovery of. [Repealed.]

396.145.
Compromise of claim.

When a claim against the estate has been presented in any manner, the personal representative may, if it appears for the best interest of the estate, compromise the claim, whether matured or unmatured, absolute or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 20, effective July 15, 1988.

396.150.
Examination of claimant. [Repealed.]

396.155.
Payment of encumbrances.

If any assets of the estate are encumbered by mortgage, pledge, lien, or secured interest, the personal representative may pay the encumbrance or any part thereof, renew or extend any obligation secured by the encumbrance or convey or transfer the assets to the creditor in satisfaction of his lien, in whole or in part, whether or not the holder of the encumbrance has presented a claim, if it appears to be for the best interest of the estate. Payment of an encumbrance does not increase the share of the distributee entitled to the encumbered assets unless the distributee is entitled to exoneration.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 21, effective July 15, 1988.

396.160.
Insolvent nonresident decedent — Payment of debts. [Repealed.]

396.165.
Recovery of overpayment.

If a personal representative pays to a creditor an undue portion of his demand or to a distributee or devisee a part or all of his share of the estate, under a mistake as to the solvency of the estate or otherwise, he may recover from the creditor, distributee or devisee the amount of the overpayment with interest.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 22, effective July 15, 1988.

396.170.
Right to pay obligations of decedent in advance of maturity. [Repealed.]

396.175.
Proportionate payment of claims.

All assets of estates being administered in this state are subject to all claims, allowances and charges existing or established against the personal representative wherever appointed.

If the estate either in this state or as a whole is insufficient to cover all exemptions and allowances determined by the law of the decedent’s domicile, prior charges and claims, after satisfaction of the exemptions, allowances, and charges, each claimant whose claim has been allowed either in this state or elsewhere in administrations of which the personal representative is aware, is entitled to receive payment of an equal proportion of his claim. If a preference or security in regard to a claim is allowed in another jurisdiction but not in this state, the creditor so benefited shall receive payment out of local assets only upon the balance of his claim after deducting the amount of the benefit.

In case the exemptions and allowances, prior charges and claims of the entire estate exceed the total value of the portions of the estate being administered separately and this state is not the state of the decedent’s last domicile, the claims allowed in this state shall be paid their proportion if local assets are adequate for the purpose, and the balance of local assets shall be transferred to the domiciliary personal representative. If local assets are not sufficient to pay all claims allowed in this state in the amount to which they are entitled, local assets shall be marshaled so that each claim allowed in this state is paid its proportion as far as possible, after taking into account all payments on claims allowed in this state from assets in other jurisdictions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 23, effective July 15, 1988.

396.180.
Duty of personal representative of mental patient. [Repealed.]

396.185.
Liability of personal representative.

Unless otherwise provided in the contract, a personal representative is not individually liable on a contract properly entered into in his fiduciary capacity in the course of administration of the estate unless he fails to reveal his representative capacity and identify the estate in the contract.

A personal representative is individually liable for obligations arising from ownership or control of the estate or for torts committed in the course of administration of the estate only if he is personally at fault.

Claims based on contracts entered into by a personal representative in his fiduciary capacity, on obligations arising from ownership or control of the estate or on torts committed in the course of estate administration may be asserted against the estate by proceeding against the personal representative in his fiduciary capacity, whether or not the personal representative is individually liable therefor.

Issues of liability as between the estate and the personal representative individually may be determined in a proceeding for accounting, surcharge or indemnification or other appropriate proceeding.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 24, effective July 15, 1988.

396.195.
Undischarged claim — Proceeding against distributees.

After assets of an estate have been distributed and subject to KRS

396.205

, an undischarged claim not barred may be prosecuted in a proceeding against one (1) or more distributees. No distributee shall be liable to claimants for amounts received as exempt property or allowances, or for amounts in excess of the value of his distribution as of the time of distribution. As between distributees, each shall bear the cost of satisfaction of unbarred claims as if the claim had been satisfied in the course of administration. Any distributee who shall have failed to notify other distributees of the demand made upon him by the claimant in sufficient time to permit them to join in any proceeding in which the claim was asserted against him loses his right of contribution against other distributees who have not been notified.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 25, effective July 15, 1988.

396.205.
Limitation on actions not otherwise barred.

Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, no cause of action on any claim not otherwise barred by the provisions of KRS

396.011

and KRS 396.055(1), or any other applicable statute of limitations, shall be brought against the personal representative or against any distributee after the expiration of two (2) years from the date of the order of discharge of the personal representative. The foregoing limitation shall not preclude an action by any claimant against the personal representative or any distributee for fraud.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 26, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 420, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Due Process and Kentucky’s Non-Claim Statutes: A Call for Legislative Revision, 91 Ky. L.J. 231 (2001-02).